Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska39-1350
Bids; contracts; department powers; department authorized to act for political subdivision.

The department shall have the authority to act for any political or governmental subdivision or public corporation of this state for the purpose of taking bids or letting contracts for the construction, reconstruction, improvement, maintenance, or repair of roads, bridges, and their appurtenances. The department, while so acting, may take such bids and let such contracts at the offices of the department in Lincoln, Nebraska, or at such other location as designated by the department if the department has the written consent of the political or governmental subdivision or public corporation where the work is to be done.

Laws 1955, c. 148, § 50, p. 439;

Laws 1969, c. 333, § 1, p. 1189;

Laws 2015, LB312, § 3;

Laws 2017, LB339, § 130.